Missouri, session 2026, SB1597.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 70.686, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 70.686,
to read as follows:
70.686. 1. (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2)
of this subsection, if a retirant becomes reemployed in a
position covered by the system by a political subdivision
from which he or she is receiving a retirement allowance,
such retirant shall forfeit one monthly benefit allowance
for each calendar month in which the retirant renders
service in connection with such reemployment.
(2) For all fiscal years beginning on or after the
July first immediately following compliance with section
105.684, but no earlier than July 1, 2027, if a retirant
becomes reemployed in a position covered by the system by a
political subdivision from which he or she is receiving a
retirement allowance and such political subdivision is a
city with less than twenty-five thousand inhabitants, the
retirant may continue to receive his or her retirement
allowance during such period of employment, provided that:

SB 1597 2
(a) Such retirant shall not contribute to the system
for compensation earned during such period of reemployment
and shall not earn any additional membership service for
such reemployment. The employer's contribution rate for
such person shall be paid by the hiring political
subdivision into the system; and
(b) The employer shall compensate a person hired under
the provisions of this subdivision:
a. At the salary commensurate with the salary of a
person with similar years of experience and level of
education on such political subdivision's salary schedule
for such position filled by the retiree or comparable
position if the position did not exist; or
b. If the employer does not utilize a salary schedule
or if the position in question is not subject to the
employer's salary schedule, then at the salary that the
political subdivision set for the position that has been
submitted and approved by the board of the system and that
is commensurate with the salary of a person with similar
years of experience and level of education;
without a discontinuance of the person's retirement
allowance, provided that such salary may be reduced by an
amount equal to the percentage of the member contribution
rate for such individual.
2. If a retirant becomes employed in a position
covered by the system by a political subdivision from which
he or she is not receiving a retirement allowance, such
retirant shall continue to receive his or her retirement
allowance during such period of employment.
3. A retirant who becomes employed by any
participating political subdivision shall be considered a

SB 1597 3
reemployed member with contributions due immediately in
accordance with sections 70.705, 70.710, and 70.720. Such
period of employment shall be for a minimum of one year of
continuous membership service before the retirant shall
receive any additional allowance.
4. Any reemployed member who has one or more years of
membership service after reemployment and later retires
shall receive an additional allowance calculated to include
only the membership service and the average compensation
earned by the reemployed member since reemployment, if such
employment is less than the period described in section
70.656. In either event, the original allowance and the
additional allowance, if any, shall become effective after a
written application is submitted in accordance with section
70.645.
5. Notwithstanding any provision of this section to
the contrary, if the retirant retired pursuant to section
70.680, the provisions of section 70.680 shall apply.
✓